Hawaii statutes.
[§661B-4] Time
limitations. Every claim arising under this chapter shall forever
be barred unless the action is commenced by filing a petition with the circuit
court within two years after the conviction that is the subject of the petition
is either reversed or vacated, or the petitioner is pardoned for that
conviction; provided that:

(1) If the claim is based on a conviction reversed or
vacated or a pardon granted prior to June 29, 2016, the claim shall be
commenced by filing a petition with the circuit court no later than July 1,
2018, or be forever barred; and

(2) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary,
this limitation of actions shall not be tolled for any reason. [L 2016, c 156,
pt of §2]

Revision Note

In paragraph (1), "June 29, 2016" substituted for
"the effective date of this chapter".

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next